Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-217
Pledged securities; substitute; when required.

If the interest on any security pledged as provided in section 8-209 remains unpaid for thirty days after maturity, the trust company shall substitute other securities therefor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 14, p. 722;

C.S.1922, § 8076;

C.S.1929, § 8-214;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 80, p. 176;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-214;

R.S.1943, § 8-217;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 31.